Massachusetts, session 194th, H1616.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 15D of chapter 265 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 13, the words “5 years” and inserting
in place thereof the following words:- “10 years”.
SECTION 2. Said section 15D, as so appearing, is hereby further amended by striking
out, in line 31, the words “10 years” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- “15
years”.
of 1